Hawaii statutes.
§266-6 Expenditures. Expenditures by
the department of transportation shall be made upon vouchers signed by the
director of transportation; provided that the director, may, in writing,
designate a qualified subordinate to sign vouchers, make routine reports, and
perform other routine business duties, subject to the direction of the
director, for whose acts the director shall be responsible.

The department may cause work to be performed
by day labor or by contract or by any other method deemed by the department to
be most advantageous to the State. [L 1947, c 72, §4; RL 1955, §112-7; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §26; HRS §266-6]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next